Hawaii statutes.
§460J-17 Death or dissociation. No
partnership, joint venture, or corporation shall be deemed to have violated
this chapter by acting or assuming to act as a pest control operator after the
death or dissociation of a licensee who had the direct management of the pest
control business thereof prior to final disposition by the board of an
application for a license made within thirty days from the date of the death or
dissociation. [L 1972, c 134, pt of §1; am L 1997, c 84, §6]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next